test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IHL_STEM_1.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_IHL_STEM_1 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_IHL_STEM_1

     hlgihl+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: hlgihl
     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl
     hlgihl+V+RELATIVE: hlgihls
     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: hlgihläsaa
     hlgihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: hlgihläs
     hlgihl+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: hlgihläsaang
     hlgihl+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: hlgihläsga
     hlgihl+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihläsaas
     hlgihl+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihläsaa.ang
     hlgihl+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgihl'uuj
     hlgihl+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'uujang
     hlgihl+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: hlgihläsaa'uujang
     hlgihl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: hlgihl'us
     hlgihl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgihl'ujaa
     hlgihl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'uujaangaa
     hlgihl+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihläsaa'us
     hlgihl+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: hlgihläsaa'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: hlgihläseehl
     hlgihl+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: hlgihl'uu
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgihl'waa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'waa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'waang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: hlgihl'wägan
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgihl'aawaa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: hlgihl'aawaan
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: hlgihl'waas
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: hlgihl'aawaas
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'waa.ang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'aawaa.ang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'wägiinii
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'wägaangaa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'wägaangaan
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: hlgihl'waaäsaa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: hlgihl'waaäs
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: hlgihl'waaäsaang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: hlgihl'waaäsga
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihl'waaäsaas
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'waaäsaa.ang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'waa.ang ñasa'áa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'waa.ang ñasa'áang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'waa.ang ñasaasdláa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'waa.ang ñasaasdláang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgihl'waa'uuj
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'waa'uujang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: hlgihl'waaäsaa'uujang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: hlgihl'waa'us
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgihl'waa'ujaa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'waa'uujaangaa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihl'waaäsaa'us
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: hlgihl'waa'ahlanggang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: hlgihl'waa'ahlanggan
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'waa'ahlanggiinii
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: hlgihl'waaäsaa'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: hlgihl'waa'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: hlgihl'aawaa'ahlang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: hlgihl'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: hlgihl'aawaa'ahlanggang
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: hlgihl'waa'ahl
     hlgihl+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: hlgihl'waaäseehl
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: hlgihl'ang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgihl'angga
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'ang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'anggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: hlgihl'anggan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgihl'aangaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: hlgihl'aangaan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: hlgihl'ans
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: hlgihl'aangaas
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'angang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'aangaa.ang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: hlgihl'anggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'anggiinii
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'anggaangaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'anggaangaan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: hlgihl'angäsaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: hlgihl'angäs
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: hlgihl'angäsaang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: hlgihl'angäsga
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihl'angäsaas
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'angäsaa.ang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgihl'ang'uuj
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'ang'uujang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: hlgihl'angäsaa'uujang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: hlgihl'ang'us
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgihl'ang'ujaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'ang'uujaangaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihl'angäsaa'us
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: hlgihl'aang'ahlanggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: hlgihl'aang'ahlanggan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'aang'ahlanggiinii
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: hlgihl'angäsaa'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: hlgihl'aang'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: hlgihl'aangaa'ahlang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: hlgihl'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: hlgihl'aangaa'ahlanggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: hlgihl'aang'ahl
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: hlgihl'angäseehl
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: hlgihl'ang'uu
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgihl'ang'waa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'ang'waa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'ang'waang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: hlgihl'ang'wägan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgihl'ang'aawaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: hlgihl'ang'aawaan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: hlgihl'ang'waas
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: hlgihl'ang'aawaas
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'ang'waa.ang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'ang'aawaa.ang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'ang'wägiinii
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'ang'wägaangaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'ang'wägaangaan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: hlgihl'ang'waaäsaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: hlgihl'ang'waaäs
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: hlgihl'ang'waaäsaang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: hlgihl'ang'waaäsga
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihl'ang'waaäsaas
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: hlgihl'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'waa.ang ñasaa'áng
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'waa.ang ñasaa'ánggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'áng
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: hlgihl'waa.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: hlgihl'ang'waa'uuj
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: hlgihl'ang'waa'uujang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: hlgihl'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: hlgihl'ang'waa'us
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: hlgihl'ang'waa'ujaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: hlgihl'ang'waaäsaa'us
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: hlgihl'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: hlgihl'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: hlgihl'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: hlgihl'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: hlgihl'ang'waa'ahlans
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: hlgihl'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: hlgihl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: hlgihl'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: hlgihl'ang'waa'ahl
     hlgihl+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: hlgihl'ang'waaäseehl
